New York, session 2025-2026, S3659.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 391-u of the 2 general business law, as added by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) A manufacturer that [produces, sells, or distributes] at any time 5 manufactured, sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale or use a 6 class B firefighting foam prohibited under subdivision three of this 7 section shall recall [the] such product[, which includes]. Such recall 8 shall include collection, transport, treatment, storage and safe 9 [disposal, after the implementation date of the restrictions set forth 10 in subdivision three of this section and reimburse] destruction of PFAS 11 chemicals through or by a method approved by the department of environ- 12 mental conservation, and reimbursement of the retailer or any other 13 purchaser for [the] such product. 14 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 391-u of the general business law, as 15 added by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, is amended by adding a new 16 paragraph (h) to read as follows: 17 (h) "Intentionally added" shall have the same meaning as "inten- 18 tionally added chemical" set forth in subdivision four of section 19 37-0121 of the environmental conservation law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00714-07-5 S. 3659--A 2 1 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 391-u of the general 2 business law, as amended by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (b) The restrictions in paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall not 5 apply to the manufacture, sale, or distribution of class B firefighting 6 foam: 7 (1) For use in suppressing or preventing an ignitable liquid fire 8 where the office of fire prevention and control, in consultation with 9 the department of environmental conservation and the department of 10 health, through promulgation of a rule, exempts a use of class B fire- 11 fighting foam on the basis that an alternative firefighting agent to 12 which PFAS chemicals have not been intentionally added and that is 13 effective in suppressing or preventing an ignitable liquid fire is not 14 available. If the office of fire prevention and control exempts a use of 15 class B firefighting foam from the restrictions in paragraph (a) of this 16 subdivision, it shall re-evaluate available alternative firefighting 17 agents at least every two years as long as the exemption remains in 18 place, and repeal such exemption upon a finding that an alternative 19 firefighting agent to which PFAS chemicals have not been intentionally 20 added is available that is effective in suppressing or preventing an 21 ignitable liquid fire. 22 (2) Where the inclusion of PFAS chemicals are required by federal law 23 or regulations. In the event that applicable federal laws or regulations 24 change after the effective date of this section to allow the use of 25 effective alternative firefighting agents that do not contain PFAS chem- 26 icals, the office of fire prevention and control [may] shall adopt rules 27 that restrict PFAS chemicals for the manufacture, sale, and distribution 28 of firefighting foam for uses that are addressed by the federal law or 29 regulation. 30 § 4. Subdivision 5 of section 391-u of the general business law, as 31 added by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, is amended by adding a new 32 paragraph (c) to read as follows: 33 (c) Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-eight, a manufacturer 34 shall not manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for 35 sale or distribute for use in the state any firefighting personal 36 protective equipment to which PFAS chemicals have been intentionally 37 added. 38 § 5. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 5 of section 391-u of the 39 general business law, as added by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, are 40 REPEALED. 41 § 6. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 5 of section 391-u of the general 42 business law, as added by section four of this act, is redesignated as 43 subdivision 5. 44 § 7. Subdivision 6 of section 391-u of the general business law, as 45 added by chapter 88 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 46 6. The office of fire prevention and control may issue guidance to 47 state agencies, fire protection districts and local governments in 48 avoiding the purchase or use of class B firefighting foams to which PFAS 49 chemicals have been intentionally added [and to give priority and pref- 50 erence to the purchase of firefighting personal protective equipment 51 that does not contain PFAS chemicals]. 52 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 53 sections five, six and seven of this act shall take effect January 1, 54 2028.